Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3001
Act, how cited.

Sections 38-3001 to 38-3014 shall be known and may be cited as the Podiatry Practice Act.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1023;

Laws 2020, LB755, § 18.